Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1459XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1459XD (3) 91
dg/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS
Section 1. Section 97B.1A, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (10) Employees of an administrative
services organization as defined in section 225A.1.
Sec. 2. Section 229.19, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in
lieu thereof the following:
a. (1) The board of supervisors of each county shall
appoint an individual to act as an advocate representing the
interests of patients involuntarily hospitalized by the court
in matters relating to a patient’s hospitalization or treatment
under section 229.14 or 229.15. The individual shall have
prior experience advocating for or promoting the welfare and
rehabilitation of persons with mental illness.
(2) A person appointed under this section shall not be any
of the following:
(a) An officer or employee of the department.
(b) An officer or employee of an administrative services
organization.
(c) An officer or employee of an agency or facility
providing care or treatment to persons with mental illness.
DIVISION II
CHILD FOSTER CARE
Sec. 3. Section 232.78, subsection 8, paragraph a,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) An individual licensed to provide foster care pursuant
to licensee under chapter 237. If the child is placed with
a licensed foster care provider an individual licensee, the
department shall assign decision-making authority to the foster
care provider individual licensee for the purpose of applying
the reasonable and prudent parent standard during the child’s
placement.
Sec. 4. Section 232.95, subsection 2, paragraph c,
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-1- dg/ko 1/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) An individual licensed to provide foster care pursuant
to licensee under chapter 237. If the child is placed with
a licensed foster care provider an individual licensee, the
department shall assign decision-making authority to the foster
care provider individual licensee for the purpose of applying
the reasonable and prudent parent standard during the child’s
placement.
Sec. 5. Section 232.102, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) An individual licensed licensee under to provide foster
care pursuant to chapter 237. If the child is placed with
a licensed foster care provider an individual licensee, the
department shall assign decision-making authority to the foster
care provider individual licensee for the purpose of applying
the reasonable and prudent parent standard during the child’s
placement.
Sec. 6. Section 234.1, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as
follows:
(1) After reaching eighteen years of age, the person has
remained continuously and voluntarily under the care of an
individual, as defined in section 237.1, licensed to provide
foster care pursuant to licensee under chapter 237, or in a
supervised apartment living arrangement, in this state.
(2) The person aged out of foster care after reaching
eighteen years of age and subsequently voluntarily applied for
placement with an individual, as defined in section 237.1,
licensed to provide foster care pursuant to licensee under
chapter 237, or for placement in a supervised apartment living
arrangement, in this state.
Sec. 7. Section 234.39, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. This subsection Paragraph “a” shall not apply when a
child is placed with a relative or fictive kin as those terms
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-2- dg/ko 2/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
are defined in section 232.2, who is not licensed under chapter
237 to provide child foster care unless the relative or fictive
kin is a licensee under chapter 237.
Sec. 8. Section 237.1, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
“Child foster care” means the provision of parental
nurturing, including but not limited to the furnishing of food,
lodging, training, education, supervision, treatment, or other
care, to a child on a full-time basis by a person, including
a relative or fictive kin of the child if the relative or
fictive kin is licensed under this chapter, but not including a
guardian of the child. “Child foster care” does not include any
of the following care situations:
Sec. 9. Section 237.1, subsection 3, paragraph f, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
f. Care furnished by a relative or fictive kin of a child
or an individual person with a meaningful relationship with
the child where the child is not under the placement, care, or
supervision of the department.
Sec. 10. Section 237.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 6A. “Fictive kin” means an adult person
who is not a relative of a child but who has an emotionally
positive significant relationship with the child or the child’s
family.
Sec. 11. Section 237.1, subsections 8 and 9, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
8. “Licensee” means an individual or an agency licensed
under this chapter, or an individual who has been approved by
the department to provide child foster care.
9. “Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the
standard characterized by careful and sensible parenting
decisions that maintain the health, safety, and best interests
of a child, while at the same time encouraging the emotional
and developmental growth of a child, that a caregiver shall
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-3- dg/ko 3/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care
under the placement, care, or supervision of the department to
participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, or social
activities. For the purposes of this subsection, “caregiver”
means an individual or an agency licensed under this chapter a
licensee with which a child in foster care has been placed or a
juvenile shelter care home approved under chapter 232 in which
a child in foster care has been placed.
Sec. 12. Section 237.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
237.2 Purpose.
It is the policy of this state to provide appropriate
protection for children who are separated from the direct
personal care of their parents, relatives, fictive kin, or
guardians and, as a result, are subject to difficulty in
achieving appropriate physical, mental, emotional, educational,
or social development. This chapter shall be construed and
administered to further that policy by assuring that child
foster care is adequately provided by competently staffed and
well-equipped child foster care facilities, including but not
limited to residential treatment centers, group homes, and
foster family homes.
Sec. 13. Section 237.3, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
10. The department shall adopt rules to administer the
exception to the definition of child care in section 237A.1,
subsection 2, paragraph “l”, allowing a child care facility, for
purposes of providing respite care to a foster family home, to
provide care, supervision, or guidance of a child for a period
of twenty-four hours or more who is placed with the licensed
foster family home.
Sec. 14. Section 237.4, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
An individual or an agency, as defined in section 237.1,
shall not provide child foster care unless the individual
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-4- dg/ko 4/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
or agency obtains a license issued under this chapter is a
licensee. However, a license is not required of the following
are not required to be a licensee:
Sec. 15. Section 237.4, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
8. An individual providing child care as a babysitter at the
request of a parent, guardian, fictive kin, or relative having
lawful custody of the child.
Sec. 16. Section 237.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
237.6 Restricted use of facility.
A An agency licensee shall not furnish child foster care
in a building or on premises not designated in the license.
A licensee shall not furnish child foster care to a greater
number of children than is designated in the license, unless
authorized by the department. Multiple licenses authorizing
separate and distinct parts of a facility to provide different
categories of child foster care may be issued.
Sec. 17. Section 237.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
237.9 Confidential information.
A person who receives information from or through the
department concerning a child who has received or is receiving
child foster care, a relative or guardian of the child, a
single-family, home licensee, or an individual employee of
a licensee, shall not disclose that information directly or
indirectly, except as authorized by section 217.30, or as
authorized or required by section 232.69. if the information
concerns any of the following:
1. A child who has received or is receiving child foster
care.
2. A relative of a child who has received or is receiving
child foster care.
3. A guardian of a child who has received or is receiving
child foster care.
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-5- dg/ko 5/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
4. A fictive kin of a child who has received or is receiving
child foster care.
5. An individual licensee.
6. An employee of a licensee.
Sec. 18. Section 237.11, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
237.11 Penalty.
An individual or an agency who provides child foster care
without obtaining a license under this chapter, or approval
from the department to provide child foster care, or who
knowingly violates this chapter or the rules promulgated
pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a serious misdemeanor.
Sec. 19. Section 237.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
237.12 Injunctive relief.
An individual or an agency who provides child foster care
without obtaining a license under this chapter, or approval
from the department to provide child foster care, or who
knowingly violates this chapter or the rules promulgated
pursuant to this chapter may be temporarily or permanently
enjoined by a court in an action brought by the state, a
political subdivision of the state or an interested person.
Sec. 20. Section 237.13, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. For the purposes of this section, “foster home” means an
individual, as defined in section 237.1, subsection 7, who is
licensed to provide child foster care and shall also be known
as a “licensed foster home” licensee.
Sec. 21. Section 237.15, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The efforts to place the child with a relative or fictive
kin.
Sec. 22. Section 237.15, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 23. Section 237A.3A, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-6- dg/ko 6/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
2025, is amended to read as follows:
d. A person who holds a child foster care license licensee
under chapter 237 shall register as a child development home
provider in order to provide child care.
Sec. 24. Section 423.3, subsection 18, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. Residential facilities licensed by the department of
health and human services pursuant to chapter 237, other than
those maintained by individuals as defined in section 237.1,
subsection 7.
DIVISION III
CHILD AND DEPENDENT ADULT ABUSE
Sec. 25. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 76. Child abuse information as defined in
section 235A.13.
NEW SUBSECTION. 77. Information obtained in the course
of an assessment or evaluation of a report of dependent adult
abuse under chapter 235B.
Sec. 26. Section 235A.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. Funds for the programs or projects shall be applied
for and received by a community-based volunteer coalition or
council entity.
Sec. 27. Section 235A.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding Subject to chapter 22, the
confidentiality of all child abuse information shall be
maintained, except as specifically provided by this section.
Sec. 28. Section 235B.2, subsection 5, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (c), Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) Exploitation of a dependent adult which means the act
or process of taking unfair advantage of a dependent adult
or the adult’s physical or financial resources, without the
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-7- dg/ko 7/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
informed consent of the dependent adult, including theft, by
the use of undue influence, harassment, duress, deception,
false representation, or false pretenses.
Sec. 29. Section 235B.2, subsection 5, paragraph a,
subparagraphs (3) and (4), Code 2025, are amended to read as
follows:
(3) (a) Sexual exploitation of a dependent adult by a
caretaker.
(b) “Sexual exploitation” means any consensual or
nonconsensual sexual conduct with a dependent adult which
includes but is not limited to kissing; touching of the clothed
or unclothed inner thigh, breast, groin, buttock, anus, pubes,
or genitals; or a sex act, as defined in section 702.17.
“Sexual exploitation” includes the transmission, display, taking
of electronic images of the unclothed breast, groin, buttock,
anus, pubes, or genitals of a dependent adult by a caretaker
for a purpose not related to treatment or diagnosis or as
part of an ongoing assessment, evaluation, or investigation.
Sexual exploitation does not include touching which is part
of a necessary examination, treatment, or care by a caretaker
acting within the scope of the practice or employment of the
caretaker; the exchange of a brief touch or hug between the
dependent adult and a caretaker for the purpose of reassurance,
comfort, or casual friendship; or touching between spouses.
(4) (a) Personal degradation of a dependent adult by a
caretaker.
(b) (i) “Personal degradation” means a willful act or
statement by a caretaker intended to shame, degrade, humiliate,
or otherwise harm the personal dignity of a dependent adult, or
where the caretaker knew or reasonably should have known the
act or statement would cause shame, degradation, humiliation,
or harm to the personal dignity of a reasonable person.
“Personal degradation” includes the taking, transmission,
or display of an electronic image of a dependent adult by a
caretaker, where the caretaker’s actions constitute a willful
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-8- dg/ko 8/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
act or statement intended to shame, degrade, humiliate, or
otherwise harm the personal dignity of the dependent adult, or
where the caretaker knew or reasonably should have known the
act would cause shame, degradation, humiliation, or harm to the
personal dignity of a reasonable person.
(ii) “Personal degradation” does not include any of the
following:
(A) The taking, transmission, or display of an electronic
image of a dependent adult for the purpose of reporting
dependent adult abuse to law enforcement, the department,
or any other regulatory agency that oversees caretakers or
enforces abuse or neglect provisions, or for the purpose of
treatment or diagnosis or as part of an ongoing investigation.
(B) The taking, transmission, or display of an electronic
image by a caretaker who takes, transmits, or displays the
electronic image in accordance with the confidentiality policy
and release of information or consent policies of a contractor,
employer, or facility or program not covered under section
235E.1, subsection 5, paragraph “a”, subparagraph (3).
(C) A statement by a caretaker who is the spouse of a
dependent adult that is not intended to shame, degrade,
humiliate, or otherwise harm the personal dignity of the
dependent adult spouse.
Sec. 30. Section 235B.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7A. “Exploitation of a dependent adult”
means a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized, or otherwise
improper act or process of an individual, including a caregiver
or a fiduciary, that results in any of the following:
a. Use of a dependent adult’s resources for the financial or
personal benefit, profit, or gain of a person other than the
dependent adult.
b. Deprivation of a dependent adult’s rightful access to or
use of the dependent adult’s benefits, resources, belongings,
or assets.
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-9- dg/ko 9/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
NEW SUBSECTION. 12A. “Personal degradation” means a
willful act or statement by a caretaker intended to shame,
degrade, humiliate, or otherwise harm the personal dignity of
a dependent adult, or where the caretaker knew or reasonably
should have known the act or statement would cause shame,
degradation, humiliation, or harm to the personal dignity of a
reasonable person.
a. “Personal degradation” includes the taking, transmission,
or display of an electronic image of a dependent adult by a
caretaker, where the caretaker’s actions constitute a willful
act or statement intended to shame, degrade, humiliate, or
otherwise harm the personal dignity of the dependent adult, or
where the caretaker knew or reasonably should have known the
act would cause shame, degradation, humiliation, or harm to the
personal dignity of a reasonable person.
b. “Personal degradation” does not include any of the
following:
(1) The taking, transmission, or display of an electronic
image of a dependent adult for the purpose of reporting
dependent adult abuse to law enforcement, the department,
or any other regulatory agency that oversees caretakers or
enforces abuse or neglect provisions, or for the purpose of
treatment or diagnosis or as part of an ongoing investigation.
(2) The taking, transmission, or display of an electronic
image by a caretaker who takes, transmits, or displays the
electronic image in accordance with the confidentiality policy
and release of information or consent policies of a facility
as defined in section 235E.1.
(3) A statement by a caretaker who is the spouse of a
dependent adult that is not intended to shame, degrade,
humiliate, or otherwise harm the personal dignity of the
dependent adult spouse.
NEW SUBSECTION. 14A. a. “Sexual exploitation” means any
consensual or nonconsensual sexual conduct with a dependent
adult which includes but is not limited to any of the
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-10- dg/ko 10/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
following:
(1) Kissing.
(2) Touching of the clothed or unclothed inner thigh,
breast, groin, buttock, anus, pubes, or genitals.
(3) A sex act, as defined in section 702.17.
b. “Sexual exploitation” includes but is not limited to
the transmission, display, taking of electronic images of the
unclothed breast, groin, buttock, anus, pubes, or genitals of
a dependent adult by a caretaker for a purpose not related to
treatment or diagnosis or as part of an ongoing assessment,
evaluation, or investigation.
c. “Sexual exploitation” does not include any of the
following:
(1) Touching which is part of a necessary examination,
treatment, or care by a caretaker acting within the scope of
the practice or employment of the caretaker.
(2) The exchange of a brief touch or hug between the
dependent adult and a caretaker for the purpose of reassurance,
comfort, or casual friendship.
(3) Touching between spouses.
Sec. 31. Section 235B.3, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
7. a. Upon a showing of probable cause that a dependent
adult has been abused, a court may authorize a person, also
authorized by the department, to make an evaluation, to enter
the residence of, and to examine the dependent adult.
b. Upon a showing of probable cause that a dependent adult
there has been financially exploited financial exploitation
of a dependent adult, a court may authorize a person, also
authorized by the department, to make an evaluation, and to
gain access to the financial records that the department
reasonably believes are related to the financial resources of
the dependent adult.
Sec. 32. Section 235B.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-11- dg/ko 11/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. Notwithstanding Subject to chapter 22, the
confidentiality of all dependent adult abuse information shall
be maintained, except as specifically provided by subsections 2
and 3.
Sec. 33. Section 235B.6, subsection 2, paragraph e,
subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Registry or department personnel when necessary to
the performance of their official duties, or a person, an
instrumentality of the state, or an agency under contract with
the department to carry out official duties and functions of
the registry.
Sec. 34. Section 249A.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 16. Require providers to share information
with the department as necessary to identify, prevent, or
respond to child abuse as defined in section 232.68, and
dependent adult abuse as defined in section 235B.2.
DIVISION IV
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES —— CONFIDENTIALITY OF
INTERNAL AUDIT AND EXAMINATION INFORMATION
Sec. 35. Section 11.41, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (10) Information, including workpapers,
created or received by the department of health and human
services while conducting an internal audit or examination
relating to an allegation of misconduct or noncompliance.
Sec. 36. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 24. a. Information, including workpapers,
created or received by the department of health and human
services while conducting an internal audit or examination
relating to an allegation of misconduct or noncompliance.
b. The department of health and human services may disclose
the information kept confidential under paragraph “a” as
necessary to complete an audit or examination, to comply with
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-12- dg/ko 12/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a state or federal law, or to allow a representative of the
department of health and human services to testify in court.
c. Information kept confidential under paragraph “a” shall
become a public record upon completion of the internal audit or
examination to which the information and workpapers pertain.
DIVISION V
REGION INCENTIVE FUND —— DISTRIBUTIONS AND TRANSFERS
Sec. 37. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ——
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES SYSTEM —— REGION INCENTIVE FUND.
1. For purposes of this section:
a. “Administrative services organization” means the same as
defined in 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1161, section 1.
b. “Behavioral health fund” means the behavioral health
fund established in 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1161, section 7,
subsection 2.
c. “Behavioral health services system” means the behavioral
health services system established in 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter
1161, section 3, subsection 1.
d. “Mental health and disability services system” means
the mental health and disability services system described in
section 225C.6B.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
there is appropriated from the region incentive fund created
in section 225C.7A, subsection 8, to the department of health
and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024,
and ending June 30, 2025, an amount necessary to ensure the
continuity of care for persons transferring services from the
mental health and disability services system to the behavioral
health services system, and to establish the behavioral health
services system. The department of health and human services
may distribute moneys appropriated under this subsection to
administrative services organizations to be used for expenses
related to the purposes described in this subsection.
3. Notwithstanding 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1161, section
7, subsection 5, moneys distributed to, and used by,
LSB 1459XD (3) 91
-13- dg/ko 13/17

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
administrative services organizations under subsection 2 shall
not count toward an administrative services organization’s
seven percent limit on administrative costs.
4. Moneys in the mental health and disability services
regional service fund established in section 225C.7A,
subsection 1, that remain unencumbered or unobligated on June
30, 2025, shall be transferred to the behavioral health fund.
Sec. 38. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.